Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.110

Center of intersection.

"Center of intersection" means the point of intersection of the center lines of the roadway of intersecting public highways.

[ 1961 c 12 s 46.04.110. Prior: 1959 c 49 s 12; prior: 1937 c 189 s 1, part; RRS s 6360-1, part.]